Illinois, session 104th, HB5223.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5adding Section 11-13-30 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-13-30 new)7    Sec. 11-13-30. Zoning regulations to encourage the 8development of housing.9    (a) If a municipality adopts zoning regulations, then the 10zoning regulations adopted by the municipality must include in 11its zoning regulations a minimum of 5 of the following housing 12strategies and must require those strategies to apply to a 13majority of the areas where residential development is 14permitted in the municipality:15        (1) The municipality must allow a duplex or other 16    higher density housing, as a permitted use, in locations 17    where a single-unit dwelling is allowed.18        (2) The municipality must allow higher density housing 19    near transit stations, places of employment, higher 20    education facilities, and other appropriate population 21    centers, as determined by the municipality.22        (3) The municipality must eliminate or reduce 23    off-street parking requirements to require no more than   HB5223- 2 -LRB104 18560 RTM 32003 b1    one parking space per dwelling unit.2        (4) The municipality must eliminate impact fees for 3    accessory dwelling units or developments that include 4    multiunit dwellings or reduce the fees for accessory 5    dwelling units by at least 25%.6        (5) The municipality must allow, as a permitted use, 7    at least one internal or detached accessory dwelling unit 8    on a lot with a single-unit dwelling occupied as a primary 9    residence.10        (6) The municipality must allow for single-room 11    occupancy developments.12        (7) The municipality must allow, as a permitted use, a 13    triplex or fourplex where a single-unit dwelling is 14    permitted.15        (8) The municipality must eliminate minimum lot sizes 16    or reduce the existing minimum lot size required by at 17    least 25%.18        (9) The municipality must eliminate aesthetic, 19    material, shape, bulk, size, floor area, and other massing 20    requirements for multiunit dwellings or mixed-use 21    developments or must remove at least half of those 22    requirements.23        (10) The municipality must provide for zoning that 24    specifically allows or encourages the development of tiny 25    houses, as defined in Appendix Q of the International 26    Residential Code as it was printed on January 1, 2023.  HB5223- 3 -LRB104 18560 RTM 32003 b1        (11) The municipality must eliminate setback 2    requirements or reduce existing setback requirements by at 3    least 25%.4        (12) The municipality must increase building height 5    limits for dwelling units by at least 25%.6        (13) The municipality must allow multiunit dwellings 7    or mixed-use development as a permitted use on all lots 8    where office, retail, or commercial uses are primary 9    permitted uses.10        (14) The municipality must allow multiunit dwellings 11    as a permitted use on all lots where triplexes or 12    fourplexes are permitted uses.13    (b) If a municipality has adopted one of strategies under 14subsection (a) before the effective date of this amendatory 15Act of the 104th General Assembly, then the housing strategy 16is considered adopted under subsection (a).17    (c) If a municipality adopts a housing strategy that 18satisfies 2 or more of the housing strategies under subsection 19(a), then only one strategy may be considered to have been 20adopted under subsection (a) for purposes of compliance with 21this Section.